Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.aff
SFX s Y 165
SFX s us      issimus         us        
SFX s us      issime          us        
SFX s us      issimum         us        
SFX s us      issimi          us        
SFX s us      issimo          us        
SFX s us      issima          us        
SFX s us      issimam         us        
SFX s us      issimae         us        
SFX s us      issimos         us        
SFX s us      issimis         us        
SFX s us      issimas         us        
SFX s us      issimarum       us        
SFX s us      issimorum       us        
SFX s 0       que             us        
SFX s 0       ne              us        
SFX s 0       ve              us        
SFX s us      issimusque      us        
SFX s us      issimusne       us        
SFX s us      issimusve       us        
SFX s us      issimeque       us        
SFX s us      issimene        us        
SFX s us      issimeve        us        
SFX s us      issimumque      us        
SFX s us      issimumne       us        
SFX s us      issimumve       us        
SFX s us      issimique       us        
SFX s us      issimine        us        
SFX s us      issimive        us        
SFX s us      issimoque       us        
SFX s us      issimone        us        
SFX s us      issimove        us        
SFX s us      issimaque       us        
SFX s us      issimane        us        
SFX s us      issimave        us        
SFX s us      issimamque      us        
SFX s us      issimamne       us        
SFX s us      issimamve       us        
SFX s us      issimaeque      us        
SFX s us      issimaene       us        
SFX s us      issimaeve       us        
SFX s us      issimosque      us        
SFX s us      issimosne       us        
SFX s us      issimosve       us        
SFX s us      issimisque      us        
SFX s us      issimisne       us        
SFX s us      issimisve       us        
SFX s us      issimasque      us        
SFX s us      issimasne       us        
SFX s us      issimasve       us        
SFX s us      issimarumque    us        
SFX s us      issimarumne     us        
SFX s us      issimarumve     us        
SFX s us      issimorumque    us        
SFX s us      issimorumne     us        
SFX s us      issimorumve     us        
SFX s 0       rimus           er        
SFX s 0       rime            er        
SFX s 0       rimum           er        
SFX s 0       rimi            er        
SFX s 0       rimo            er        
SFX s 0       rima            er        
SFX s 0       rimam           er        
SFX s 0       rimae           er        
SFX s 0       rimos           er        
SFX s 0       rimis           er        
SFX s 0       rimas           er        
SFX s 0       rimarum         er        
SFX s 0       rimorum         er        
SFX s 0       que             er        
SFX s 0       ne              er        
SFX s 0       ve              er        
SFX s 0       rimusque        er        
SFX s 0       rimusne         er        
SFX s 0       rimusve         er        
SFX s 0       rimeque         er        
SFX s 0       rimene          er        
SFX s 0       rimeve          er        
SFX s 0       rimumque        er        
SFX s 0       rimumne         er        
SFX s 0       rimumve         er        
SFX s 0       rimique         er        
SFX s 0       rimine          er        
SFX s 0       rimive          er        
SFX s 0       rimoque         er        
SFX s 0       rimone          er        
SFX s 0       rimove          er        
SFX s 0       rimaque         er        
SFX s 0       rimane          er        
SFX s 0       rimave          er        
SFX s 0       rimamque        er        
SFX s 0       rimamne         er        
SFX s 0       rimamve         er        
SFX s 0       rimaeque        er        
SFX s 0       rimaene         er        
SFX s 0       rimaeve         er        
SFX s 0       rimosque        er        
SFX s 0       rimosne         er        
SFX s 0       rimosve         er        
SFX s 0       rimisque        er        
SFX s 0       rimisne         er        
SFX s 0       rimisve         er        
SFX s 0       rimasque        er        
SFX s 0       rimasne         er        
SFX s 0       rimasve         er        
SFX s 0       rimarumque      er        
SFX s 0       rimarumne       er        
SFX s 0       rimarumve       er        
SFX s 0       rimorumque      er        
SFX s 0       rimorumne       er        
SFX s 0       rimorumve       er        
SFX s is      issimus         is        
SFX s is      issime          is        
SFX s is      issimum         is        
SFX s is      issimi          is        
SFX s is      issimo          is        
SFX s is      issima          is        
SFX s is      issimam         is        
SFX s is      issimae         is        
SFX s is      issimos         is        
SFX s is      issimis         is        
SFX s is      issimas         is        
SFX s is      issimarum       is        
SFX s is      issimorum       is        
SFX s 0       que             is        
SFX s 0       ne              is        
SFX s 0       ve              is        
SFX s is      issimusque      is        
SFX s is      issimusne       is        
SFX s is      issimusve       is        
SFX s is      issimeque       is        
SFX s is      issimene        is        
SFX s is      issimeve        is        
SFX s is      issimumque      is        
SFX s is      issimumne       is        
SFX s is      issimumve       is        
SFX s is      issimique       is        
SFX s is      issimine        is        
SFX s is      issimive        is        
SFX s is      issimoque       is        
SFX s is      issimone        is        
SFX s is      issimove        is        
SFX s is      issimaque       is        
SFX s is      issimane        is        
SFX s is      issimave        is        
SFX s is      issimamque      is        
SFX s is      issimamne       is        
SFX s is      issimamve       is        
SFX s is      issimaeque      is        
SFX s is      issimaene       is        
SFX s is      issimaeve       is        
SFX s is      issimosque      is        
SFX s is      issimosne       is        
SFX s is      issimosve       is        
SFX s is      issimisque      is        
SFX s is      issimisne       is        
SFX s is      issimisve       is        
SFX s is      issimasque      is        
SFX s is      issimasne       is        
SFX s is      issimasve       is        
SFX s is      issimarumque    is        
SFX s is      issimarumne     is        
SFX s is      issimarumve     is        
SFX s is      issimorumque    is        
SFX s is      issimorumne     is        
SFX s is      issimorumve     is        
