Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.dic
absolutus/abcs
absurdus/abcrs
acris/fgrst
acutus/abcrs
admirabilis/fgqrs
agilis/fgrst
altus/abcrs
amplus/abcrs
angustus/abcrs
antiquus/abcrs
apertus/abcrs
aptus/abcrs
arabicus/abs
arctus/abcrs
artificiosus/abcs
brevis/fgqrst
capacis/fgrs
celeber/qs
celsus/abcrs
certus/abcrs
citus/abcrs
clarus/abcrs
coloratus/abcrs
commendatus/abcrs
commodus/abcrs
communis/fgqrst
compressus/abcrs
concinnus/abcrs
conglobatus/abcrs
consisus/abcrs
consultus/abcrs
consummatus/abcs
convexus/abcrs
copiosus/abcrs
corpulentus/abcrs
correctus/abcrs
corruptus/abcrs
crassus/abcrs
creber/s
curiosus/abcrs
curtus/abcrs
decentis/fgs
delicatus/abcrs
densus/abcrs
dignus/abcrs
diligentis/defgs
divinus/abcs
doctus/abcrs
efficacis/defgrs
emendatus/abcs
eruditus/abcrs
evidentis/fgrs
exactus/abcrs
excellentis/fgs
exiguus/abcrs
expansus/abcrs
fabulosus/abcs
falsus/abcrs
fastidiosus/abcrs
fidelis/fgqst
firmus/abcrs
fortis/fgqrs
frequentis/fgrs
generalis/fgqrst
gracilis/fgqrs
gratus/abcrs
gravis/fgqrst
grossus/abcrs
horologicus/abs
humanus/abcs
illustris/fgqrst
imbecillus/abcrs
immoderatus/abcrs
imprudentis/fgrs
inclinatus/abcrs
ingeniosus/abcrs
inordinatus/abcs
intensus/abcrs
inutilis/fgqrst
iucundus/abcrs
languidus/abcrs
latus/Sabcqrs
lentus/abcrs
levis/fgqrst
literatus/abcs
longus/abcrs
luminosus/abcrs
manifestus/abcrs
meritus/abcrs
minutus/abcrs
moderatus/Sabcrs
modestus/abcrs
modicus/abcrs
nobilis/fgqrs
notus/abcrs
obliquus/abcrs
oblongus/abcrs
obscurus/abcrs
obtusus/abcrs
oculatus/abcs
officiosus/abcs
opportunus/abcrs
ordinatus/abcrs
parcus/abcrs
particularis/fgrst
paucus/abcrs
pauper/qs
peculiaris/fgqrst
perfectus/abcrs
peritus/abcrs
perspicacis/fgrst
perspicuus/abcrs
planus/abcrs
plenus/abcrs
pluviosus/abcs
pluvius/abcs
ponderosus/abcs
portentosus/abcs
potentis/fgrs
potis/fgs
praeclarus/abcrs
praestantis/fgrs
preciosus/abcs
probatus/abcs
proclivis/fgqrs
profundus/abcrs
promptus/abcrs
propinquus/abcrs
prudentis/fgrs
pulcher/s
purus/abcrs
quaestuosus/abcs
rapidus/abcs
rarus/abcrs
recentis/fgrs
rectus/abcrs
remotus/abcrs
reverendus/abcs
robustus/abcrs
rotundus/abcs
rubicundus/abcrs
sanctus/abcs
serenus/abcs
simplicis/defgrst
specialis/fgs
splendidus/abcrs
studiosus/abcs
suavis/fgqrst
subtilis/fgqrst
sylvosus/abs
tardus/abcrs
tenacis/fgrst
tener/abcrs
tenuis/fgqrs
tutus/abcrs
utilis/fgqrst
valentis/fgrs
validus/abcrs
vehementis/fgrs
velocis/defgrst
veracis/fgrs
verus/abcrs
vetustus/abcrs
vicesimus/abcs
vicinus/abcrs
delatum/sc
delegatum/sc
